Utah statutes.
72-4-122.   State highways -- SR-161 to SR-165, SR-167, SR-168.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-161.  From Route 70 near Cove Fort northwesterly to Route 15.

(2)  SR-162. From Route 191 in Bluff easterly to the Utah-Colorado state line.

(3)  SR-163.  From the Utah-Arizona state line southwest of Mexican Hat northeasterly to Route 191 near Bluff.

(4)  SR-164.  From Route 15 southwest of Spanish Fork easterly to Route 198 one-half mile south of Spanish Fork.

(5)  SR-165.  From Paradise northerly through Hyrum and Nibley to Route 91 in Logan.

(6)  SR-167.  From Route 84 near Mountain Green northerly on Trappers Loop Road to Route 39 south of Huntsville.

(7)  SR-168.  From the north entrance of Hill Air Force Base northerly to Route 60 in Riverdale.



Amended by Chapter 79, 2006 General Session

